da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Dele og tilbehør til skøjter: Kunstskøjtestøvler; Isskøjteklinger; Dele og tilbehør til skøjteslibere; Isskøjteslibere; Skøjteklingebeskyttere; Klingeovertræk til skøjter; Skøjteovertræk; Indlægssåler og fodsenge til skøjter; Snørebåndsstrammere; Skøjtesnørebånd
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Phụ tùng và phụ kiện giày trượt băng: Giày trượt băng không lưỡi; Lưỡi giày trượt băng; Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy mài giày trượt băng; Máy mài giày trượt băng; Thiết bị bảo vệ lưỡi giày trượt băng; Bọc thấm hút lưỡi giày trượt; Bọc thân giày trượt; Lót giày và đệm lót giày trượt; Móc thắt dây giày; Dây giày trượt
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Детали и аксессуары для коньков: Ботинки для фигурного катания; Лезвия для коньков; Детали и аксессуары для станков для заточки коньков; Инструменты для заточки коньков; Чехлы для лезвий коньков; Мягкие чехлы-сушки для лезвий коньков; Чехлы на ботинки коньков; Стельки для коньков; Затягиватели шнурков для коньков; Шнурки для коньков
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Dijelovi i pribor za klizanje na ledu: Čizme za umjetničko klizanje; Oštrice klizaljki; Dijelovi i pribor za oštrilo za klizaljke; Oštrilice za klizaljke; Štitnici za oštrice klizaljki; Namakanje za oštrice klizaljki; Navlake za čizme za klizanje; Ulošci i ležišta za stopalo za klizanje; Zatezači vezica na klizaljkama; Vezice za klizanje
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイススケート靴パーツ・関連用品: フィギュアスケート靴; アイススケート用ブレード; アイススケートシャープナーパーツ＆アクセサリー; アイススケート用研磨機; アイススケート用ブレードカバー; スケートブレードソーカー; スケートブーツカバー; スケート用インソール・フットベッド; アイススケート用レースタイトナー; スケート靴紐
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Accesorios para patines de hielo: Botas de patinaje artístico; Cuchillas para patines de hielo; Piezas y accesorios para afiladores de patines sobre hielo; Afiladores de patines de hielo; Protectores para cuchillas; Fundas absorbentes para cuchillas de patines; Cubrebotas para patines; Plantillas para patines; Ganchos para cordones; Cordones para patines
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Schlittschuhzubehör: Eiskunstlaufstiefel; Schlittschuhkufen; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Schlittschuhschleifer; Schlittschuhschleifer; Kufenschoner; Schlittschuh-Kufenschoner; Schlittschuh-Überzüge; Einlegesohlen & Fußbetten für Schlittschuhe; Schnürhilfen; Schlittschuhschnürsenkel
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰刀/冰鞋零件/配件: 花样滑冰鞋; 冰刀; 冰鞋磨刀器零件和配件; 冰刀磨刀器; 冰刀保护套; 冰刀吸水保护套; 冰鞋鞋套; 冰鞋鞋垫; 紧线器/拉紧器; 冰鞋鞋带
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Díly a příslušenství k bruslím: Brusle na krasobruslení; Nože pro brusle; Díly a příslušenství pro brusky na lední brusle; Brusky na brusle; Chrániče na brusle; Měkké chrániče nožů na brusle; Návleky na brusle; Vložky do bruslí; Utahovače tkaniček bruslí; Tkaničky do bruslí
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Schaatsonderdelen en -accessoires: Kunstschaatsschoenen; Schaatsijzers; Onderdelen en accessoires voor schaatsslijpers; Slijpstenen; Schaatshoezen; Beschermhoezen voor schaatsijzers; Schaatschoenhoezen; Inlegzolen en voetbedden voor schaatsen; Vetertrekkers voor schaatsen; Schaatsveters
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Deler og tilbehør for kunstløp: Kunstløpskøyter; Skøyteblader; Deler og tilbehør til skøytesliper; Skøyteslipere; Skøytebladbeskyttere; Myke skøytebeskyttere; Skøytetrekk; Skøytesåler og fotsenger; Lissetrammere for skøyter; Skøytelisser
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorcsolya-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Műkorcsolyacsizmák; Jégkorcsolyapengék; Korcsolyaélező-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Jégkorcsolya-élezők; Korcsolyapenge-védők; Korcsolyapenge-védő huzatok; Korcsolyacipő-védők; Korcsolya talpbetétek; Korcsolyafűző-szorítók; Korcsolyafűzők
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Buz Pateni Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Artistik Patinaj Patenleri; Buz Pateni Bıçakları; Buz pateni bileyici parçaları ve aksesuarları; Buz Pateni Bileyicileri; Paten Bıçak Muhafazası; Paten bıçağı emici kılıfları; Paten bot kılıfları; Paten tabanlıkları; Paten Bağcık Sıkılaştırıcıları; Paten bağcıkları
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Części i akcesoria do łyżew: Buty do łyżew figurowych; Płozy łyżew; Części i akcesoria do ostrzałek do łyżew; Ostrzałki do łyżew; Ochraniacze płozy łyżwy; Miękkie ochraniacze na płozy do łyżew; Pokrowce na buty do łyżew; Wkładki do łyżew; Napinacze do sznurowadeł; Sznurowadła do łyżew
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Luistinten osat ja tarvikkeet: Taitoluistinkengät; Luistinten terät; Luistimenteroitinten osat ja lisävarusteet; Luistinten teroituskoneet; Luistinten teräsuojat; Teräsuojat; Luistimen päälliset; Luistinten pohjalliset; Luistinten nauhojen kiristystyökalu; Luistinnauhat
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 스케이트 부품/부대용품: 피겨 스케이트 부츠; 스케이트날; 아이스 스케이트 날 연마기 부품 및 액세서리; 스케이트날 연마기; 스케이트 날 보호대; 스케이트 블레이드 소커; 스케이트 부츠 커버; 스케이트 인솔 및 풋베드; 스케이트 끈 조임 장치; 스케이트 끈
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Acessórios e peças para patins de gelo: Botas de patinagem artística; Lâminas para patins de gelo; Peças e acessórios para afiadores de patins de gelo; Afiadores de patins de gelo; Protetores de lâmina para patins; Protetores absorventes para lâminas de patins; Capas para botas de patins; Palmilhas e suportes plantares para patins; Dispositivos de aperto de cordões de patins; Atacadores para patins
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Peças e acessórios para patins para gelo: Botas de patinação artística; Lâminas de patins para gelo; Peças e acessórios para afiadores de patins de gelo; Afiadores de patins para gelo; Proteção para as lâminas dos patins; Protetores atoalhados para lâmina de patins; Capas para bota de patins; Palmilhas e suportes plantares para patins; Tensores para cadarços de patins; Cadarços para patins
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Componenti e accessori per pattinaggio su ghiaccio: Pattini per pattinaggio artistico; Lame per pattini da ghiaccio; Componenti e accessori per affilapattini da ghiaccio; Affilatori pattini da ghiaccio; Coprilama per pattini; Coprilame assorbi-umidità per pattini; Copripattini; Solette e plantari per pattini; Tiralacci per pattini da ghiaccio; Lacci per pattini
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Delar och tillbehör för skridskoåkning: Konståkningsskor; Skridskoskenor; Delar och tillbehör för skridskoslipar; Skridskoskärpare; Skridskoskydd; Mjuka skridskoskydd; Skridskoöverdrag; Sulor och inlägg till skridskor; Snöråtdragare för skridskor; Skridskosnören
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Deli in dodatki za drsalke: Čevlji za drsanje; Rezila za drsalke; Deli in dodatki za brusilnike za drsalke; Brusilci za drsalke; Ščitniki za rezila drsalk; Namakalniki za rezila drsalk; Prevleke za drsalke; Vložki in podplati za drsalke; Pripomočki za zavezovanje vezalk na drsalkah; Vezalke za drsalke
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Части и аксесоари за кънки на лед: Боти за фигурно пързаляне; Остриета за кънки на лед; Части и аксесоари за острилки за кънки; Точила за кънки на лед; Предпазители за остриета на кънки; Калъфи за остриета за кънки; Калъфи за кънки; Стелки и подложки за кънки; Уреди за стягане на връзките за кънките; Връзки за кънки
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ πατινάζ πάγου: Μπότες καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ; Λεπίδες παγοπέδιλων; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ ακονιστηριών για παγοπέδιλα; Τροχιστές παγοπέδιλων; Προστατευτικά λεπίδων παγοπέδιλων; Καλύμματα λεπίδων παγοπέδιλων; Καλύμματα για μπότες παγοπέδιλων; Πάτοι και υποστρώματα παγοπέδιλων; Σφιγκτήρες κορδονιών παγοπέδιλων; Κορδόνια παγοπέδιλων
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Pačiūžų dalys ir priedai: Dailiojo čiuožimo batai; Pačiūžų ašmenys; Pačiūžų galandinimo įrenginių dalys ir priedai; Pačiūžų galąstuvai; Pačiūžų ašmenų apsaugos; Pačiūžų peilių apsaugos; Pačiūžų batų apsaugos; Pačiūžų vidpadžiai ir pėdų įdėklai; Pačiūžų batraiščių veržikliai; Pačiūžų raišteliai
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Časti a príslušenstvo pre korčule: Krasokorčuliarske korčule; Čepele na korčule; Časti a príslušenstvo k brúske na korčule; Brúsky na korčule; Chrániče čepele korčúľ; Chrániče na čepele korčúľ; Návleky na korčule; Vložky a stielky do korčúľ; Uťahovače šnúrok na korčuli; Šnúrky na korčule
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 溜冰鞋零件/配件: 滑冰鞋鞋體; 冰刀鞋用冰刀; 冰鞋磨刀機零件與配件; 溜冰鞋刀磨刀器; 冰刀鞋護套; 冰刀吸水保護套; 溜冰鞋套; 溜冰鞋鞋墊; 冰刀鞋綁鞋器; 溜冰鞋鞋帶
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สเก็ตน้ำแข็ง: รองเท้าสเกตลีลา; เบลดสำหรับสเกตน้ำแข็ง; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องลับคมรองเท้าสเก็ตน้ำแข็ง; เครื่องเหลารองเท้าสเกตน้ำแข็ง; ที่ป้องกันใบมีดสเกต; ปลอกผ้าซับน้ำหุ้มใบมีดรองเท้าสเกต; ปลอกหุ้มรองเท้าสเกต; แผ่นรองพื้นรองเท้าสเกต; ที่ดึงเชือกรองเท้าสเกตให้แน่น; เชือกรองเท้าสเกต
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Pièces et accessoires de patins à glace: Chaussures de patinage artistique; Lames de patins à glace; Pièces et accessoires d'affûteurs de patins à glace; Affûteuses de patins à glace; Protège-lame de patins; Protège-lames absorbants pour patins; Couvre-bottes de patinage; Semelles et assises plantaires pour patins; Tendeurs de lacets pour patins; Lacets de patins
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Ice Skate Parts & Accessories: Figure Skate Boots; Ice Skate Blades; Ice Skate Sharpener Parts & Accessories; Ice Skate Sharpeners; Skate Blade Guards; Skate Blade Soakers; Skate Boot Covers; Skate Insoles & Footbeds; Skate Lace Tighteners; Skate Laces
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Piese și accesorii pentru patinaj pe gheață: Patine pentru patinaj artistic; Lame pentru patinaj pe gheață; Piese și accesorii pentru aparate de ascuțit patine; Dispozitive de ascuțire patine; Protecții pentru lama patinelor; Huse absorbante pentru lamele patinelor; Huse pentru botul patinei; Branțuri și tălpi interioare pentru patine; Role de strângere a șireturilor pentru patine; Șireturi pentru patine